Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2106
Board of directors; officers; bylaws; quorum.

Upon organization such board of directors shall elect one of its members chairperson and one vice-chairperson, both of whom shall serve for one year, and shall appoint a secretary as provided in section 14-2109. The board shall make such rules governing its procedure and adopt such bylaws governing its business as it may deem proper. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, but a smaller number may adjourn from time to time until a quorum is secured.

Laws 1913, c. 143, § 6, p. 352;

R.S.1913, § 4248;

C.S.1922, § 3751;

C.S.1929, § 14-1007;

R.S.1943, § 14-1007;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1007;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 6.